Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-817
Schools; contract of employment; writing required.

A contract for the employment of a teacher or administrator for a public school in the State of Nebraska shall be in writing.

Laws 1943, c. 201, § 1, p. 672;

R.S.1943, § 79-2146;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 348, p. 807;

Laws 1971, LB 802, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1248;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 447;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 17.

Teacher's contract must be in writing on form recommended by Commissioner of Education. Johnson v. School Dist. No. 3 of Clay County, 168 Neb. 547, 96 N.W.2d 623 (1959).

Use of contract form recommended by Superintendent of Public Instruction prevented discharge by district board. Greer v. Chelewski, 162 Neb. 450, 76 N.W.2d 438 (1956).